



Utah based Home Improvement Contractors and Construction Companies








 Last Updated: 22 July 17






Utah located Construction Businesses








 Last Updated: 22 July 17








Free Quotes in South Jordan Roofing & Remodeling Contractors, Painters All American Acoustics Inc












South Jordan Last Updated: 28 July 17








Free Quotes in South Jordan Roofing & Remodeling Contractors, Painters All American Acoustics Inc














South Jordan Last Updated: 28 July 17







Jones Steven C 10100 South 1000 West South Jordan Concrete & Concrete Products Dealers


















Jones Steven C Last Updated: 28 July 17






JONES STEVEN C South Jordan Utah Concrete & Concrete Products Dealers






























JONES STEVEN C Last Updated: 28 July 17








Airbag and Seatbelt Product Liability - Law Offices of Steven C. LairdLaw Offices of Steven C. Laird



















































 

 





Open MenuHome
About Us
Practice Areas

Personal Injury
Wrongful Death
Trucking Accidents
Car Wrecks
Construction Accidents
Defective Products
Oil and Gas Field Injuries
Business Litigation


Attorneys

Steven C. Laird
Seth McCloskey


Experience
News
Legal Articles
Videos
Contact





















(817) 531-3000
 info@texlawyers.com










Law Offices of Steven C. Laird




Search








Home » legal articles » Airbag and Seatbelt Product Liability



Airbag and Seatbelt Product Liability

Posted on January 1, 2014  by  authenticwebxxx 



ARE SAFETY RESTRAINTS SAFE?

ADVANCED PRODUCT LIABILITY SEMINAR
HOUSTON, TEXAS – JANUARY 1997
Steven C. Laird
Russell, Turner, Laird & Jones
1824 8th Avenue
Fort Worth, TX 76110
817-531-3000
I. INTRODUCTION
Since lap belts were first offered by Ford Motor Company in 1955, automobile manufacturers have been developing and refining a variety of methods for restraining occupants in the event of a collision. These have included manual systems that require the occupant to buckle up, as well as passive systems, that require no action by the occupant.
Although the auto manufacturers impeded efforts to mandate passive restraint systems and delayed the effective date of regulations, beginning in the 1986 model year Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard (FMVSS) 208 required a phase-in of passive restraints. By 1990 all new passenger cars were required to have passive restraint systems, and light trucks, utility vehicles, and vans will undergo a phase-in of passive restraints from September 1, 1994, through September 1, 1997.
On September 1, 1993, the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA) issued a final rule which mandates that every passenger car manufactured after September 1, 1997, and every light truck manufactured after September 1, 1998, must be equipped with an airbag and a manual lap/shoulder belt at both the driver’s and light front passenger’s seating positions.
As of July 1990, 36 states, the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico had mandatory seatbelt use laws in effect, and usage rates have dramatically increased from their previous low levels. This has resulted in a decrease in motor vehicle fatalities and serious injuries. However, a number of the older occupant-restraint systems on the road today, including some currently used in new vehicles, are defective and can actually enhance injuries in the event of a collision. What follows is a summary of some of the more common defect theories in occupant-restraint system litigation, and the typical defenses asserted by manufacturers.
II. DEFECT THEORIES
A. Rear-Seat Lap Belt Systems
Although valuations of the three-point lap and shoulder system have been around since the 1950s, until they were recently required to do so, many manufacturers were equipping rear seats of their vehicles with only lap belts. There is an extensive body of scientific and industry literature going back to the mid-1960s which demonstrates that without a shoulder harness, the use of a lap belt can cause serious injuries. In the absence of a shoulder harness to distribute loads over the body, the upper torso can jackknife over the lap belt, causing severe abdominal and spinal injuries, as well as severe trauma to the head. For decades there has been a growing body of evidence that shoulder harnesses will prevent such injuries.
The history behind the failure of most of the industry to voluntarily equip rear seats with three-point systems is enlightening. Even though manufacturers delayed putting the inexpensive three-point harnesses in rear seats of most vehicles sold in the United States until FMVSS mandated them, many of their identical vehicles and model years sold in other countries were equipped with three-point systems.
In the United States, some manufacturers had rear-seat shoulder harnesses as standard equipment in only top-of-the-line vehicles, while others put them in several or all car lines. In the mid-1980s, when the government asked manufacturers to make rear-seat lap belt retrofit kits available to the public through dealerships and to promote their availability, manufacturers were slow to do so and many dealers did not stock the kits. As a result, the vast majority of car owners were unaware of this important safety feature. The following is a brief chronology of events relating to rear-seat restraint systems:
1967 – U.S. manufacturers provide lap belts at rear outboard locations. Volvo introduces three-point belt in rear as standard in certain markets.
1969 – Mercedes-Benz adds three-point belt in rear outboard seats as standard in all markets. Japan requires seat-belts front and rear.
1970 – Victoria, Australia requires three-point belts front and rear and mandates use front and rear. Sweden requires belts in rear-diagonal and static allowed-lap belt only not approved.
1972 – West Germany requires three-point belts front and ream NHTSA requires anchorages for detachable shoulder strap for rear outboard positions (FMVSS 210). Volvo makes three-point seat-belts in rear outboard seating positions standard equipment on all vehicles, all markets.
1975 – Sweden requires three-point emergency locking retractor belts in rear.
1979 – France mandates seat-belts in rear, either three lap belts or three points at outboard positions. New Zealand requires three-point belts front and real, outboard positions
1983 – Saab introduces three-point in rear on all models sold in the United States, which it had provided for years in Scandinavia and Europe.
1986 – National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) recommends that any manufacturer of passenger vehicles with only lap belts at rear outboard positions provide aftermarket retrofit assemblies to convert belts to integrated continuous loop self-storing lap-shoulder belt systems, and make the availability of these retrofit systems widely known to U.S. vehicle owners.
1988 – BMW, Volkswagen, Audi, Honda, and Saab all use standard rear seat shoulder harnesses on all models. Manufacturers using standard rear-seat shoulder harnesses in only some models include Chrysler with six models, Ford with five, General Motors with 12, Toyota with two, Nissan with one.
1990 – All passenger vehicles sold in United States required to have shoulder harnesses with lap belts in rear outboard seating positions.
B. Automatic Belts
Just as a system with only a lap belt can cause enhanced injury, a two-point shoulder harness system used without a lap belt is also a serious safety hazard. Occupants can be subjected to severe neck injuries due to being “clotheslined” by the shoulder harness when the lower body moves forward. This is true especially for small adults and children. Also, with all of the load being taken up by a single harmless, there is an increased risk of the head spiking the interior of the vehicle. In the event of a rollover, due to the free movement allowed by the absence of pelvic restraint, an occupant can be ejected or, in some circumstances, decapitated by the heavily loaded harness slicing through the neck.
There are two types of automatic belt cases. The first involves a passive restraint system, which is provided with an independent lap belt. This system, which has been used in millions of cars since 1984, uses a non-detachable motorized shoulder harness and a manual lap belt. When the door shuts, the shoulder harness moves into place across the occupant’s body. However, the vast majority of occupants, unaware of the serious risk involved, do not latch the lap belt, either forgetting to do so because there is a harness across their body or intentionally failing to do so because they believe that they are adequately restrained by the automatic shoulder harness. Recent studies have shown that even though motorized shoulder belts are worn in 90 percent of these cars, they are used with the manual lap belt in only 20 percent.
A second type of case involves vehicles that were, surprisingly, manufactured without any lap belts. Due to an apparent loophole in FMVSS 208, certain Hyundai and Volkswagen vehicles were produced with a system that has a shoulder harness and a “knee bolster,” a padded area below the dash. This system was first used by Volkswagen in 1975. The knee bolster allegedly acts as a lower body restraint and replaces the lap belt. In reality, it does neither. Unless a person’s knees are right up against the bolster, there is lower body movement forward and sometimes under the bolster. This dangerous system, which was considered and rejected by other manufacturers long ago, is no longer in use in new vehicles, but was still being manufactured into the late 1980s. There are tens of thousands of these vehicles still on the road.
With the two-point system, the occupant kinematics are dramatically altered by removing the lap belt and relying upon the knee bolster for pelvic restraint. A lap belt, which is in constant contact with the pelvis, begins to restrain the body almost immediately upon impact. However, a knee bolster only begins to work, if at all, in a straight frontal collision when the occupant’s knees have moved forward far enough to contact the bolster.
Depending upon the position of the seat and the length of the occupant’s femurs, the knees may travel several inches forward relative to the seat back. Consequently, the pelvis and lower body will also travel forward the same distance. This results in additional excursion of the body forward, a phenomenon known as “submarining,” which can occur in any automatic system without a lap belt in place.
Submarining changes the position of the occupants body as well as the location of the shoulder harness on the body as the occupant moves forward. The position of the shoulder harness will be higher on the upper torso and, in some circumstances, will be located directly on the neck. When this occurs, the occupant is no longer in a position where his or her body can be efficiently decelerated, and the forces of the restraint system upon his body can no longer be distributed safely. Additionally, significant loading is placed directly upon the neck, which is much less capable of withstanding direct forces than the chest. If the knees strike the bolster but glance under it, the problem is magnified. The resulting trauma or post-impact pressure on the neck can result in fatal injuries, quadriplegia from neck injury, decapitation, or anoxic brain damage.
Another danger inherent in these systems is that they allow not only improper movement of the occupant and forces on the wrong areas of the body, but also put excessive loads on the belt itself. The webbing, which is the actual belt component, stretches to a certain extent during dynamic loading. If the harness is forced to do the work of restraining the portion of the body that is normally held by the lap belt, the amount of potential stretch and upper body excursion will increase. Thus, even if an occupant remains uptight, the risk of his or her head striking the dash increases.
Finally, these systems are completely ineffective in the event of a rollover. A three-point system with a lap belt may prevent an occupant from being ejected, which is critical because the risk of fatal injuries increases several times in the event of ejection. Without a lap belt, there is a much greater chance of the occupant’s body moving out of the system and leaving the vehicle, particularly if the door comes open in a non-motorized system that anchors at the door frame. Moreover, while a three-point system can sometimes prevent an occupant’s head from striking the roof in a rollover, thereby preventing neck injury if the roof does not collapse, there is a greater potential for a head strike without a lap belt. Also, if the pelvis is allowed to move freely during a rollover, significant loads can be placed on the neck by the belt. In some cases this has been sufficient to cause quadriplegia and even decapitation.
The following is a chronology relating to the use of shoulder harnesses without lap belts:
1957 – Volvo introduces the two-point diagonal shoulder belt as an accessory.
1959 – Volvo finds the two-point diagonal shoulder belt unacceptable and replaces it with the three-point belt.
1961 – “. . . a good safety belt should . . . be designed in such a way that. . . there should be no risk of the belt forming a loop around the occupant’s neck . . .
1962 – “With a diagonal shoulder belt the C.G. of the body is usually below the line of the belt and in a forward impact there would be a tendency to slide out from under the belt.”
1962 – “. . . with diagonal chest straps alone the wearer may slide out from under the belt or suffer severe internal injuries . . .”
1965 – “The diagonal belt has no strap to decelerate the lower part of the body and therefore . . . the occupant’s body can submarine under the belt . . .
1967 – “This report describes three cases of fatal neck injuries in subjects wearing the diagonal safety belt, probably caused by the lower jaw being temporarily caught in the belt when the subject slipped out of the belt and was ejected from the car.”
1969 – “. . . the single diagonal belt only . . . does not provide pelvic restraint, which allows the subject’s lower torso to swing forward and rotate out of the belt at impact . . .
1969 – “. . . the diagonal belt has been utilized in three tests . . . In each case the subject was not restrained by the belt, and was flung from the seat, literally hanging himself as rotation occurred about the inferior axis of the belt . . . “
1970 – “. . . this type of strap can cause injuries to internal organs or the neck (when the wearer slides out of the belt). Even a lap strap alone was considered preferable since at least it put the pressure on the well-protected pelvic area.”
1974 – Volkswagen introduces the passive two-point restraint system with a knee bolster.
1976 – General Motors rejects the passive shoulder-belt-only system because of “. . . reservations about the appropriateness of depending on a knee impact surface instead of a lap belt to provide lower torso restraint. We cannot be sure, for example, that a knee impact surface used in conjunction with a passive shoulder belt will adequately protect an out-of-position occupant, a small adult or a child occupant in frontal or angular accidents . . .”
1978 – “As was to be expected, ejection is significantly more frequent with two point shoulder belts that with three point harnesses.”
1981 – “. . . The foregoing discussion implies that the effectiveness of the two-point automatic belt is lower overall than that of the conventional three-point belt system, a conclusion consistent with official estimates published by the US DOT . . .”
1987 – Hyundai introduces the two-point passive shoulder-belt-only restraint system in the United States.
1991 – NHTSA-ODI Investigation EA-91-048 of Automatic Shoulder Belt Failures for 1987 through 1989 Hyundai Excels:
– 48 accidents
– 43 injuries
– 7 fatalities
“A preliminary analysis of the ODI complaint database shows that the complaint rate is higher for the subject vehicles than for the Excels equipped with the three-point manual belts . . .’
C. Intermittent Locking Failure-“Skip-locking”
A common source of injury is a defect in the design of the retractor mechanism, the component of the restraint system that winds the belt and locks the belt in place during a collision. There are numerous types of retractor mechanisms in use today, and their effectiveness in preventing injury ranges from excellent to adequate to dangerous.
Some retractor mechanisms use an inertial locking mechanism such as a pendulum or a caged ball, which locks the webbing when the vehicle is subjected to a certain rate of deceleration. Other retractors use a webbing sensing device, which locks when the webbing is moved relative to the vehicle at a certain speed. Some systems use a combination of the two, as well as a pretensioning device to eliminate initial belt slack in the event of a collision. FMVSS 209 requires that emergency locking retractors must lock before the webbing extends one inch when the retractor is subjected to an acceleration of 0.7g.
Certain retractors are prone to failure due to the use of inadequate materials or poorly designed internal components, which will fail when subjected to reasonably expected load forces. One example of this is a phenomenon known as skip-locking. Skip-locking has been defined as the failure of the retractor to lock under dynamic loads, or intermittent or late locking during the crash pulse. In a typical retractor design that utilizes a rotating wheel with teeth, there are one or more pawls designed to engage the teeth and lock the belt. However, some designs utilize plastic or soft metal that can break or chip, preventing the pawl from engaging or causing it to engage intermittently. If this occurs, the belt can spool out and turn a three-point system into a two point system.
In the mid- to late-1970s, NHTSA investigated certain refractors which were failing when subjected to testing requited by FMVSS 209. It was discovered that some of the retractors had failure rates as high as 50 percent. This resulted in design changes that were incorporated in an attempt to eliminate skip-locking. However, some manufacturers are putting out new vehicles with retractors that are still prone to skip-locking. When such a failure occurs, occupants sustain injuries similar to those involved in rear.-seat lap belt cases, including head trauma and spinal cord injuries.
D. Tension-Relieving Devices
Another defective occupant-restraint system design involves the use of devices designed to allow the occupant to introduce slack by pulling on the belt or leaning forward. These have been called “tension relievers” and “comfort features.” They are more commonly known as “window shade devices,” since they operate much like a window shade.
This feature was introduced by some manufacturers for passenger comfort in the 1970s. In 1976, General Motors began equipping most of its vehicles with these slack-inducing devices, and other domestic manufacturers followed suit. However, no foreign manufacturers adopted these features.
The problem with slack-inducing devices is that they allow several inches of slack to be introduced into the belt, either intentionally or unintentionally, which allows more forward movement by the occupant in a collision. Unintentional excessive slack can be induced from normal movement within the car such as reaching for the radio or the glove compartment.
Excessive slack in seat-belts undisputedly will reduce the effectiveness of a restraint system. The additional excursion results in an increased risk of head contact with the interior of the vehicle, higher values of Head Injury Criterion and greater chest G’s. Also increased peak loads are placed on the occupant due to the greater distance from the seat when the restraint is contacted by the body.
In 1979, NHTSA proposed a ban on tension relieving devices, which was never implemented because of the strenuous objection of the manufacturers. The manufacturers defended the devices by arguing that they encouraged belt wearing and increased usage rates by occupants who were irritated by belts, particularly children and adults of smaller stature.
In 1985, the NTSB concluded that “permitting additional slack in the shoulder belt is not an acceptable way to deal with belt geometry generated by poor anchor design and location,” and that slack introduced can “permit dangerous head contact in a crash.” In January 1986, a NHTSA analysis concluded that “in the real world most tension relievers automatically introduce slacking of the belt with normal movements of the occupants.”
Most manufacturers have since eliminated tension relieving devices from their models manufactured in the 1990s. General Motors announced in February 1990 that it was phasing out the devices to “reduce the potential for occupant misuse.” Chrysler eliminated the devices in their United States built 1990 models. Research has shown that the devices did not result in increased belt use, and that occupant-restraint systems that utilized these devices were consistently less effective in reducing injury than systems without them. Safer solutions to the problem of seat-belt irritation include adjustable anchorages that change the location of the shoulder harness to account for variations in height and seat position.
E. Inadvertent Unlatching
Because of the poor design of some types of buckling devices, the deceleration and other forces generated in a collision axe sometimes sufficient to cause unlatching of the seat-belt. Certain buckle pawls can be depressed by sharp blows or sudden deceleration, allowing the latch plate to pull away and rendering the occupant-restraint system useless. The phenomenon of inertial unlatching has been demonstrated in crash testing done by the auto manufacturers themselves.
In the late 1970S, NHTSA opened an engineering analysis based on allegations that some buckles would release when they were subjected to a sharp blow on the front or back. Subsequent testing by the NHTSA Office of Defect Investigation was conducted to determine the vulnerability of seat-belt latching mechanisms to inadvertent latching. Tests of 225 American cars manufactured over an eight-year period showed that 50 buckles opened inadvertently. Where an individual has been injured in a collision and it appears that he was not wearing the belt post-crash, yet eyewitnesses confirm he had buckled up, he may be the victim of a poorly designed latching mechanism.
F. Integrated Seat-Belt Systems
An inherent problem with occupant restraints presently in use is that their effectiveness is highly dependent upon seat adjustment, because the anchorage is attached to points on the floor, door, and B-pillar. As the seat is adjusted relative to these points, the position of the belt on the occupant’s body, and thus its effectiveness, can change significantly. Variations in occupant height and body size will affect the location of the belt as well. On persons of smaller stature and children, the upper portion of the belt will tend to locate much higher on the body and on the neck.
Since at least as early as 1974, manufacturers have been studying the concept of an “integrated” seat-belt system where the belt is attached directly to the seat. Thus, all anchorage points move with the seat as it is adjusted or moved. Some manufacturers, including Audi; Mercedes; and BMW; have incorporated integrated seat-belt systems into current models Promotional materials claim that the integrated seat-belt system will “provide maximum protection to people of all sizes and in all seat adjustment positions,” and that they will provide “optimum belt alignment in all seating positions.”
Not only will integrated seat-belts eliminate problems relating to poor belt fit caused by seat adjustment and height, but they will provide much greater protection in the event of a rollover. An occupant will be held in the seat more effectively, and greater separation between occupant’s head and the ceiling will be maintained. Additionally, with an integrated seat-belt, unlike belts that are attached to doors or B-pillars, the restraint system will remain effective even if the door opens or if the seat or B-pillar are moved relative to each other.
III. DEFENSES
A. Federal Preemption
In the area of occupant-restraint system litigation this defense is becoming extremely popular. There are essentially three FMVSS that concern seat-belts and their performance:
FMVSS 208 – Occupant Crash Protection;
FMVSS 209 – Seat-belts; and
FMVSS 210 – Seat-belt Assembly Anchorages.
The cases rejecting preemption and the arguments against preemption are too numerous to list here, but there is a body of authority holding that FMVSS 208 (which provides manufacturers three different options for occupant protection systems in terms of performance requirements), was intended by the federal government to preempt common-law liability for failure to install airbags or passive restraint systems. Although this is contrary to the Savings Claude of the National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act, which preserves common-law liability, in most jurisdictions a plaintiff is not permitted to base a claim on the fact that a manufacturer did not install an airbag. The rationale advanced is that the government adopted a scheme to slowly phase in passive restraint systems, and that to require installation of airbags or passive restraint systems would frustrate that intent.
Some manufacturers have attempted to stretch this concept to encompass any type of occupant-restraint system litigation. So far there are no reported decisions accepting such an extension of the defense. Moreover, appellate courts have made it clear that FMVSS 208 only sets forth minimum standards of performance, and although a manufacturer cannot be forced to select one of three options for occupant-restraint under FMVSS 208, it may still be liable for defectively designing the option it does select.
There are numerous cases at the state and federal level concerning pre-emption arguments which would support both plaintiff and defense. Anyone having a question on pre-emption in restraint cases should immediately consider contacting Arthur Bryant at Trial Lawyers for Public Justice, (202) 797-8600. He is considered to be one of the leading experts in the nation on pre- emption, and should be consulted before mapping out a legal strategy which could inadvertently result in bad case law.
B. Superseding Cause
In any crashworthiness litigation manufacturers inevitably argue that the plaintiff’s injuries were not enhanced by the design, and that the force of the collision was so great that the plaintiff would have sustained the same or worse injuries irrespective of a different design.
In an occupant-restraint system case, defendants will argue that state-of-the-art occupant-restraint systems are ineffective over 35 m.p.h., and that at such speeds any design will permit serious injuries. If the plaintiff has sustained a severe brain injury, a new defense tactic is to argue that the plaintiff sustained what is called diffuse axonal injury, caused by rapid rotational acceleration or deceleration of the brain. The defendant will contend that even if the occupant had been prevented from striking the interior of the vehicle by a better restraint system, the rotational forces were so high that the occupant would have sustained permanent brain damage.
Under such circumstances the defense will dispute not only the cause of the injury, but the nature of the injury itself. Proof of causation will require an analysis by an accident reconstructionist, a biomechanic, and physicians. It therefore becomes critical for the plaintiff’s attorneys to thoroughly document the care and treatment of the plaintiff from the scene of the accident forward. This should include not only acquisition of all pertinent medical records and interviews with treating physicians and other medical personnel, but interviews with eyewitnesses, paramedic personnel, firemen, ambulance drivers, and anyone who could possibly have any information concerning the physical condition of the plaintiff at any point in time following the accident.
C. Unforeseeable Misuse
Manufacturers will frequently argue that the occupant-restraint system was being used improperly, thereby defeating the belt’s effectiveness. A common contention is that the injured plaintiff did not follow the instructions in the owner’s manual concerning use of the restraint system. Manufacturers will also contend the occupant was not seated correctly or that the seat or belt was positioned improperly.
In some cases this may be the result of the often confusing and ambiguous statements in the written materiels provided. However, even where the plaintiff has not followed the owner’s manual to the letter, counsel for plaintiff should determine if there is a defect based on failure to warn. While manufacturers usually give a list of do’s and do not’s in their owner’s manuals, in many cases there is no information given as to the consequences of the failure to follow those instructions. If a person is advised that serious injury or death is a potential result, he or she is much more likely to follow specific instructions as to belt adjustment and seat position.
Non-use or misuse are easy arguments for defendants to make, since belts are often unbuckled post-crash by other passengers or people arriving at the scene. Also, when vehicles come to rest after a collision, even a properly seated and belted occupant is rarely in a normal seating position. This defense should be anticipated and taken out by early, thorough investigation.
Statements from witnesses should be obtained to document the plaintiff’s position and use of the belt pre-impact, as well as position post-crash. Bruises and lacerations on the body left by the webbing will identify the precise location of the belt at the time of the collision. These should be extensively photographed and videotaped immediately, before they disappear. The restraint system itself may contain critical evidence regarding the belt’s position and how it performed, such as marks on the webbing from retractor components, or even skin tissue or honed.
IV. CONCLUSION
Even with the availability of research and literature demonstrating the defective nature of many occupant-restraint systems and the well-documented history of the failure of auto manufacturers to remedy known defects in their restraint system designs, these are extremely difficult cases to win. Taking on an auto manufacturer in a major injury case involving a restraint system design defect is expensive.
The plaintiff’s attorney must be prepared to spend up to and above a six-figure amount to work up and try some of these cases, and should expect that the manufacturer will spend two to three times that amount. Certainly not every case represents this type of expenditure, but the problem is that the attorney never knows at the outset what the ultimate necessary costs will be. The plaintiff’s attorney must be committed to obtaining the best experts from around the country in accident reconstruction, occupant-restraint system design and testing, biomechanics, automotive engineering, and case-specific fields of medicine. A state-of-the-at demonstrative evidence presentation at trial is essential, and may require full-scale mock-ups and crash testing. Despite the financial and legal hurdles facing the plaintiff’s attorney, these cases can be successful provided they are worked up properly and afforded sufficient time and resources.
– Steven C. Laird, Laird & Cummings, P.C.,
1824 8th Avenue, Fort Worth, Texas 76110, 817-531-3000, www.texlawyers.com
 





Watch Our Legal Rights Consumer Video Series 
Search 
Search



 
 



 Steve Laird is among a distinguished and exclusive number of lawyers in Texas who are board certified in three specific areas of practice.

View Steve Laird's Profile



News & Updates Law Firm News And Updates
News And Updates From The Fort Worth Law Firm Of Steven C. Laird, P.C.
Over the years, attorney Steve Laird has become a trusted...
Read more...

 








Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














Steven C. Jones - Chief Compliance Officer at NeoGenomics, Inc.



























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              




























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Steven C. Jones
Chief Compliance Officer at NeoGenomics, Inc.



Overview
In The News Relationships Paths
Education Career History Boards & Committees Political Donations Public Holdings Transactions Events 


Steven C. Jones
Chief Compliance Officer at NeoGenomics, Inc.



 Overview



Age



52
                                  (Born 1965)
                                              




Notable Companies


PEAK6 Investments LP

CTC Communications Group, Inc.

Fiera Group, Inc.




Board Seats



8





Number of Relationships



                This person is connected to 1,047 people.
              






 In The News
          See more




Marketwired
July 25, 2017





                        NeoGenomics Reports Record Revenue of $66.1 Million on 16% Volume Growth and 13% Reduction in Average Cost per Test in the Second Quarter of 2017                    





Marketwired
April 26, 2017





                        NeoGenomics Reports 15% Volume Growth and 10% Reduction in Average Cost per Test in the First Quarter of 2017                    





PR Newswire
January 17, 2014





                        NeoGenomics Schedules its Q4 2013 and Full Year 2013 Earnings Release for February 19, 2014                    







See full news coverage and complete stories with RelSci Professional.

Create Your News Feed








See  More 






 Relationships
              See Details




Douglas M. VanOort

Chief Executive Officer at NeoGenomics, Inc.




Lawrence T. Drzal

Co-Founder at XG Sciences, Inc.





Michael T. Dent

Founder at NeoGenomics, Inc.




Robert P. Gasparini

Former President & Chief Scientific Officer at NeoGenomics, Inc.





Philip L. Rose

Chief Executive Officer at XG Sciences, Inc.




Raymond R. Hipp

Former President & Chief Executive Officer at Alternative Resources Corp.





William J. Robison

Founding Member at Museum of The Marine




George A. Cardoza

Chief Financial Officer & Senior Vice President at NeoGenomics, Inc.





Kieran P. Murphy

Senior Vice President, Chief Executive Officer of the Life Sciences Business at General Electric Company




Bruce K. Crowther

President at Northwest Community Healthcare Foundation







See 1,037 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 1,037 More 


 


 Paths to Steven C. Jones



            Steven C. Jones          




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Steven C. Jones






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Steven C. Jones.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Educational Background



MBA 
Class of 1991 


University of Pennsylvania - The Wharton School

                  The Wharton School is the business school of the University of Pennsylvania, an Ivy League university in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. Wharton was the world’s first collegiate business school and the first business school in the United States. It was established in 1881 through a donation of Joseph Wharton.                




 
Class of 1985 


University of Michigan

                  The University of Michigan (UM, U-M, UMich, or U of M), frequently referred to as simply Michigan, is a public research university located in Ann Arbor, Michigan, United States. It is the state's oldest university and the flagship campus of the University of Michigan. It is one of the original eight Public Ivy universities and is one of the founding members of the Association of American Universities. It has been ranked among the top five research universities in the US, and among the top 20 universities in the world. U-M also has satellite campuses in Flint and Dearborn.                





 Career History



Chief Compliance Officer

                                    2003 - Current                


NeoGenomics, Inc.


                  NeoGenomics, Inc. provides cancer diagnostics and pharma services. It operates through a network of cancer focused testing laboratories to provide genetic and molecular testing services. It offers various testing services, including Cytogenetics, Fluorescence In-Situ Hybridization, Flow Cytometry, Immunohistochemistry, Molecular testing and Pathology consultation. The company operates through one segment: Laboratory Testing Segment. The Laboratory Testing segment delivers testing services to hospitals, pathologists, oncologists, other clinicians and researchers. The company was founded by Michael T. Dent on October 29, 1998 and is headquartered in Fort Myers, FL.                




Founder

                                    2003 - Current                


Aspen Capital Group LLC


                  Aspen Capital Group LLC provides financial services. It specializes in commercial real estate loans. The firm also provides hard money and bridge loan is an asset-based loan using commercial real estate as collateral. The company was founded by Steven C. Jones in 2003 and is headquartered in Kingston, PA.                




Partner

                                    Current                


Aspen Opportunity Fund LP


                  Aspen Opportunity Fund invests in US-based companies in the healthcare, information technology, telecommunications, alternative energy and organic products sectors. They look for companies with proven business models, sound management teams, strong market positions, acceptable profit margins, recurring revenue streams and positive financial outlooks. The firm invests in companies with revenues of $2 million to $50 million. Companies should also be able to achieve positive EBITDA within 12 months of the firm's investment. Aspen Opportunity seeks companies operating in growing markets in the US that have a global presence.                




Managing Director

                                    Current                


Medical Venture Partners, LLC






Director, Executive Vice President-Finance

                                    Current                


SeqWright, Inc.


                  SeqWright, Inc. provides contract genomic research services. Its services include new tests, test methologies, special testing and tech-only program. The company was founded by John W. Belmont and Richard Gibbs in 1994 and is headquartered in Houston, TX.                




President & Managing Director

                                    2001 - ?                


Aspen Capital Advisors






General Partner

                                    Tenure Unconfirmed                


Aspen Select Healthcare LP






Vice President-Investment Banking Group

                                    Tenure Unconfirmed                


Merrill Lynch & Co., Inc. (Inactive)


                  Merrill Lynch & Co., Inc. provides wealth management, securities trading and sales, corporate finance and investment banking services. Merrill Lynch is a global trader and underwriter of securities and derivatives across a range of asset classes and serve as a strategic advisor to governments, institutions and individuals worldwide. The company was founded in 1973 and is located in Charlotte, NC.                




Chief Financial Officer

                                    2001 - Prior                


PEAK6 Investments LP


                  PEAK6 Investments LP provides investment services. It offers market making, risk management, and online brokerage. The company was founded by Matthew Nels Hulsizer and Jennifer Just Makowiec in 1997 and is headquartered in Chicago, IL.                




Founder

                                    Prior                


T3 Communications, Inc.


                  T3 Communications, Inc. provides telecommunication services including cloud based hosted PBX, colocation and disaster recovery, broadband ethernet and integrated voice and data. The company was founded by Steven C. Jones in 2002 and is headquartered in Fort Myers, FL.                




Chief Financial Officer

                                    Prior                


CTC Communications Group, Inc.


                  CTC Communications Corp. is an integrated communications carrier providing business customers from Maine to Maryland with a full range of converged voice, data and Internet services dynamically allocated on a next-generation, all-IP packet-based network. The company serves small, medium and larger business customers. The company is located in Waltham, MA.                




Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President

                                    Prior                


Fiera Group, Inc.







 Boards & Committees



Corporate Boards ▾




Executive Vice President, Chief Compliance Officer & Director

                    2003 - Current                  


NeoGenomics, Inc.

                    NeoGenomics, Inc. provides cancer diagnostics and pharma services. It operates through a network of cancer focused testing laboratories to provide genetic and molecular testing services. It offers various testing services, including Cytogenetics, Fluorescence In-Situ Hybridization, Flow Cytometry, Immunohistochemistry, Molecular testing and Pathology consultation. The company operates through one segment: Laboratory Testing Segment. The Laboratory Testing segment delivers testing services to hospitals, pathologists, oncologists, other clinicians and researchers. The company was founded by Michael T. Dent on October 29, 1998 and is headquartered in Fort Myers, FL.                  




Chairman

                    2003 - Current                  


Aspen Capital Group LLC

                    Aspen Capital Group LLC provides financial services. It specializes in commercial real estate loans. The firm also provides hard money and bridge loan is an asset-based loan using commercial real estate as collateral. The company was founded by Steven C. Jones in 2003 and is headquartered in Kingston, PA.                  




Chairman

                    Current                  


SpinaDyne, Inc.






Chairman

                    Current                  


Quantum Health Systems LLC






Director

                    Current                  


XG Sciences, Inc.

                    XG Sciences, Inc. engages in the manufactures and sells engineered graphene products. It provides graphene nanoplatelets and develop advanced engineered materials based on its nanoplatelets. The company was founded by Inhwan Do, Michael R. Knox, Hiroyuki Fukushima Scott Murray and Lawrence T. Drzal and is headquartered in Lansing, MI.                  




Director & Executive Vice President-Finance

                    Current                  


SeqWright, Inc.

                    SeqWright, Inc. provides contract genomic research services. Its services include new tests, test methologies, special testing and tech-only program. The company was founded by John W. Belmont and Richard Gibbs in 1994 and is headquartered in Houston, TX.                  




Director

                    Current                  


Disc Motion Technologies, Inc.






Chairman

                    Prior                  


T3 Communications, Inc.

                    T3 Communications, Inc. provides telecommunication services including cloud based hosted PBX, colocation and disaster recovery, broadband ethernet and integrated voice and data. The company was founded by Steven C. Jones in 2002 and is headquartered in Fort Myers, FL.                  





 Political Donations



$250

                  2008                


John McCain


                  Senator from Arizona                




$500

                  2008                


The Republican National Committee, Inc.


                  The Republican National Committee (RNC) is a U.S. political committee that provides national leadership for the Republican Party of the United States. It is responsible for developing and promoting the Republican political platform, as well as coordinating fundraising and election strategy. It is also responsible for organizing and running the Republican National Convention. Similar committees exist in every U.S. state and most U.S. counties, although in some states party organization is structured by congressional district, allied campaign organizations being governed by a national committee. Reince Priebus is the current RNC Chairman.                





 Public Holdings






Restricted data only for RelSci Professional users.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Transactions



 Details Hidden



                  NeoGenomics, Inc. raised money in a private placement transaction                                  





 Events



Speaker

                  New York City, NY                




2013 UBS Global Healthcare Conference







 Other Affiliations




              Steven C. Jones is affiliated with
                            NeoGenomics, Inc., Aspen Capital Group LLC, Aspen Opportunity Fund LP, Medical Venture Partners, LLC, SeqWright, Inc., Aspen Capital Advisors, Aspen Select Healthcare LP, Merrill Lynch & Co., Inc. (Inactive), PEAK6 Investments LP, T3 Communications, Inc., CTC Communications Group, Inc., Fiera Group, Inc., NeoGenomics, Inc., Aspen Capital Group LLC, SpinaDyne, Inc., Quantum Health Systems LLC, XG Sciences, Inc., SeqWright, Inc., Disc Motion Technologies, Inc., T3 Communications, Inc..
            





You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.












Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤















Steven C Jones                                                                                                           - Carpinteria                                       , CA         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



CA



Carpinteria



Single-Family Housing Construction



Single-family Housing Construction



                            Steven C Jones
                                    



 





















S 


Steven C Jones                                                                                                          
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



4984 MALIBU DR APT B CARPINTERIA, CA 93013
Get Directions



(805) 432-9809
 





Business Info



 Founded 1998
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $99,000.00
 Employee Count 1
 Industries Single-family Housing Construction
 Contacts Steven C Jones                                                                                                          







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 1998, Steven C Jones                                                                                                           has been providing Single-family Housing Construction from Carpinteria. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







S

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.
















Jones, Steven C Agency- A State Farm Co - Youngstown, OH - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



OH



Youngstown



Insurance Agents, Brokers, and Service



Insurance Agents, Brokers, And Service



                            Jones, Steven C Agency- A State Farm Co
                                    



 





















J 


Jones, Steven C Agency- A State Farm Co
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



704 E MIDLOTHIAN BLVD YOUNGSTOWN, OH 44502
Get Directions



(330) 788-0500
www.stevencjonesagency.com





Business Info



 Founded 2006
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $500,000.00
 Employee Count 3
 Industries Insurance Agents, Brokers, And Service
 Contacts Steven Jones







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 2006 the company has been providing Insurance Agents, Brokers, And Service. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







J

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.


























Jones Steven C | Ann Arbor MI | Read Reviews + Get a Bid | BuildZoom


































































×





Want a quote from
Jones, Steven C?


We recommend getting 3 quotes
for any construction project. 
Use our
free bidding system
to get a quote from Jones, Steven C
+ 2 more of the best.



Tell us about your project









Is this your business? Claim now >






J







BZ Score:
90







License # 12046-5




Ann Arbor, MI









Jones, Steven C




this is my business



Contact us






BZ Score:
90







WRITE A REVIEW















Summary

this is my business
request a quote















Home

 
/


Search

 
/


Ann Arbor

 
/


 best Architects in Ann Arbor 

 



Updated: Mar 30, 2016





Overview

Jones, Steven C in Ann Arbor, MI holds a Architect  license (12046-5) according to the Wisconsin license board. Their BuildZoom score of 90 indicates that they are licensed or registered but we do not have additional information about them.BuildZoom has not verified this license since its expiration date. If you are thinking of hiring Jones, Steven C, we recommend double-checking their license status with the license board and using our bidding system to get competitive quotes. 




Where Jones, Steven C Works


Google





Project Types Offered



Architectural Drawings and ...
Other Architecture and Engi...






Contact


Do you work for this business?
Unlock this free profile
to update company info and see who's viewing your profile.






Similar Contractors
See more









Wyandotte, MI 48192

(231) 916-9385 ext. 907


Remark Home Designs LLC




License # 2102174771


Wyandotte, MI



5

1
rating








112

BZ Score


$158K
Avg Project 


3
Projects














1225 Bending Rd., Ann Arbor, MI 48103

(313) 528-0642 ext. 8814


Architectural Resource




License # ARCH-150012


Ann Arbor, MI







101

BZ Score


$202K
Avg Project 


7
Projects














5101 Williams Lake Road, Waterford, MI 48329

(313) 528-0642 ext. 3195


Architectural Planners Incorporated




License # CONT-120138


Waterford, MI







100

BZ Score


$117K
Avg Project 


6
Projects













Jones, Steven C Reviews



BuildZoom hasn't received any reviews for Jones, Steven C. Click here to be alerted when reviews are posted about them.



Please write a review about Jones, Steven C










1
Rate this architect







Click stars to rate




2
Provide a detailed review of this architect.






 














Recent Buildzoom Projects


View all








Custom Home Build










Restaurant Buildout










Swimming Pool Project










Kitchen Remodel










Bathroom Remodel








Request a Quote





Explore BuildZoom

If you are considering hiring Jones, Steven C,
we recommend double-checking their license status with the license board
and using our
bidding system
to get competitive quotes.




Hiring a contractor?






Get bids from BuildZoom's best contractors within 5 mins during regular business hours by filling out this form




I need help with...





Zip Code





Request Quotes From





90


Jones, Steven C








112


Remark Home Designs LLC







101


Architectural Resource







100


Architectural Planners Incorporated






Request a Quote







License info














License Not Verified


License #12046-5StatusActiveStateWisconsinTypeArchitect


When BuildZoom last verified this license, it had an expiration date of July, 2016. Check the current license status of Jones, Steven C with the Wisconsin Department of Safety and Professional Services












90




BuildZoom Score


How the BuildZoom Score works








Follow this contractor








Employees







Jones, Steven C
Owner


















Before you Hire

Here are some rules, regulations, and laws governing general contractors
in Wisconsin:













Does Jones, Steven C carry a valid contracting license?



All residential and commercial construction in Wisconsin requires a licensed contractor.
Jones, Steven C currently holds license 12046-5 (Architect), which was Active when we last checked. 











Your liability risk when hiring Jones, Steven C



Licensed contractors in Wisconsin must carry both general liability and workers' compensation insurance, request a copy of current insurance certificates for each.











Financial recourse when hiring Jones, Steven C



Licensed contractors in Wisconsin are required to obtain a surety bond.In the event of losses or damages incurred during a construction project,a homeowner can file a claim against a contractors bond.











How is the BuildZoom score calculated?



The BuildZoom score is based on a number of factors including the contractor's license status, insurance status, verified work history, standing with local consumer interest groups, verified reviews from other BuildZoom users and self-reported feedback from the contractor.











Why you should hire through BuildZoom



When it comes to major construction work or even minor alterations to your home, hiring the wrong contractor could result in incomplete or defective work. You may even find yourself dealing with huge liability claims. BuildZoom does the homework for you and helps you hire the right contractor.











You should get several bids before hiring a contractor



Before hiring a contractor in Wisconsin, be sure to get at least 3 detailed bids. Quality contractors will take the time to explain their budget proposal,and help guide you through the estimate process. Be wary of an abnormally low bid, they are not worth the risk. These underpriced projects often do not end well for the homeowner, choose a contractor you trust and can clearly communicate with. BuildZoom has made the bid collection process extremely simple (and free). Just click here to get started.









About BuildZoom






BuildZoom has one simple purpose: To help you find the perfect contractor
for any job, commercial or residential.


BuildZoom is a database of every licensed contractor in the United States.
We work hard to figure out who the great contractors are, and who the bad
contractors are.

more...





BuildZoom combines license information on 3.5 million contractors with
110 million building permits, and over 80,000
reviews from property owners.If you are looking for a specific
contractor and you can’t find them on BuildZoom, it’s likely that they do
not have a license - please
contact us
and we’ll try to help!



Finding a Contractor through BuildZoom



The best way to use BuildZoom is to let us recommend contractors for
your remodeling projects.


Homeowners who

hire through BuildZoom's free bidding system
 report high rates of satisfaction, and homeowners who research
contractors online are twice as likely to be happy at the end of their
project.


If you hire a contractor through BuildZoom, that contractor is
accountable to us. We can enforce standards of behavior, mediate
disputes, and guarantee satisfaction.



Read more about why hiring through BuildZoom is so effective.
 
less...









Press Coverage





BuildZoom’s database now contains every licensed contractor across the U.S. - over 2.5 million of them... Categorized contractor profiles are enriched using government data from state licensing boards, Better Business Bureau ratings, and more…


BuildZoom jumped into the fray by announcing that it raised $10.6 million in a round led by Formation 8. ...the Y combinator-backed startup said it will be focused on remodeling projects, where the median budget is around $19,000…


A new index compiled by BuildZoom — which identifies contractors for projects — found that renovations are
running 2.8 percent above their 2005 level…




















×
Contact Jones, Steven C
We will attempt to deliver your message to Jones, Steven C. We'll notify you when it is delivered.













Your Name

Your Email

Your Phone (optional)

Your Message

I'm interested in speaking with you about a project. Are you available to chat today?

 









‹
›
×




×












 
How the BuildZoom Score Works
Read more about the BuildZoom scoring algorithm here.


A Licensed Contractor Starts with 90 Points.


Their score will increase or decrease based on these variables.
























Positive Client Feedback





Verified License + Insurance





Project History





Community Participation





Profile Page Content


Employee Info
Years in Business
Contact Info
Project Photos









Suspended or Inactive License





Negative Client Feedback





Limited Work History
























Browse remodeling photos
If you are looking for remodeling ideas, you can browse hundreds of beautiful photos of work performed by our general contractors.






Browse building permits
You can use our building permit search to see the contractors who are active in your neighborhood and the projects currently taking place.






Get a cost estimate
Use our remodeling calculator to get a ballpark estimate for your project. If you're ready to hire, use our bidding system to get actual quotes from local contractors.



































































Jones Steven C (Import & export history)
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French



 

Get global shipment alerts for Jones  Steven C, $9.95 /month

Processing, please wait ...







Cardholder's Name


Tell us your Full Name



Credit Card No. 








Enter a valid Card No.



Exp. Date

1 January
2 February
3 March
4 April
5 May
6 June
7 July
8 August
9 September
10 October
11 November
12 December




2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026



Postal Code / Zip


(or Postal Code if not in the USA)




  Terms of Service




Submit















			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 



Jones  Steven C

Jones  Steven C imports from Bayerische Motoren Werke Ag in United Kingdom through the port of Baltimore, Maryland        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Jones  Steven C and millions of other importers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database

 PANASONIC CONSUMER ELECTRONICS COMP
 PEPSICO
 CVS PHARMACY INC
 SHIN CATERPILLAR MITSUBISHI        
 FAMILY DOLLAR STORES,INC.
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Jones  Steven C
Jones  Steven C imports from Bayerische Motoren Werke Ag in United Kingdom through the port of Baltimore, Maryland


                                Bill of Lading                            





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



BAYERISCHE MOTOREN WERKE AG
PETUELRING 130 MUENCHEN DE


JONES  STEVEN C
605 WEST 6TH ROAD GILTNER NE US



Notify Party
Marks and Numbers



IFF INC  INTERNATIONAL FREIGHT FORW
452 A PLAZA DRIVE P O BOX 45505 COLLEGE PARK GA US



5UXZW0C54CL671718
5UXZW0C54CL671718





Master Bill of Lading Number
Container Number






NC
NC


Product Description




BMW X5 2012



BMW X5 2012












Bill of LadingWLWHGB1353119Arrival Date2013-09-03Weight (LB)4,895Weight (KG)2,225UnitsMQuantity1 VEHContainer Count1CBM17Voyage No.CC308Port of LoadingSOUTHHAMPTONPort of DischargeBALTIMORE, MARYLANDVessel NameTOSCACarrier CodeWLWHCountry Of OriginUnited KingdomPlace Of ReceiptSOUTHAMPTON 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Jones  Steven C. Join Now 







How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Get e-mail alerts when Jones  Steven C has new shipments.                        

Processing, please wait ...









Submit












Contact Jones  Steven C







 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 





Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.








Jones  Steven C
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 109,970,574 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In





















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 

















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Cv. Persona Rattan Nusantara                                



                                    Premier Tech Horticlture Inc                                



                                    Conta Elastik Urunler Sanayi Ve Tic                                



                                    Green Narea Pacific                                



                                    No.16.hang Chuan Road,damaiwan Indu                                











                     
                                            109,970,574  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.4161
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X















 Jones Stephens | WE GOT IT.           
MenuPlumbingSeatsDecorativeContractor Specialties & MROMade in USA

Search



About UsDownloadsPress RoomContact Us













 Click for More Info






 Click for More Info






 CLICK FOR MORE INFORMATION






 Click for More Info






 Click for More Info






 Click to View Items in Program 






 Click for more information
Download Our CatalogFind Spec/MSDSFirst Name*Last Name*Email*
NameThis field is for validation purposes and should be left unchanged. 






 
Please enter a product code to search for any available specification or MSDS sheets.

Featured Products

 
Heavy Duty 20 Gallon Utility SinkM60003
List: $117.44
Learn More

 
Washing Machine Box, Center Outlet Without ...B05942
List: $29.49
Learn More

 
CleanWave Sensor Activated FlushG01850
List: $79.00
Learn More

 
Satin Nickel Two Handle Gooseneck Kitchen ...1558033
List: $59.76
Learn More

 
Orange Safety VestB05090
List: $21.68
Learn More

 
Brute® 32 Gallon Gray Utility Container, ...G80003
List: $66.69
Learn More

 
3" Green Drain Waterless Trap SealP24002
List: $54.78
Learn More

 
5/8" x 36" Water Meter KeyM25536
List: $17.18
Learn More

 
5" x 8" Stud Guard, 16 ...S33003
List: $1.74
Learn More

 
Deluxe Molded Wood Seat, White, Elongated ...C014WD00
List: $24.00
Learn More

   